Rhode Island, session 2025, SB814.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-32-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-32 entitled "Obstructing
Justice" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-32-2. False report of crime False report of crime or official misconduct.
(a) Every person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made, whether oral or written,
a false statement of a:
(1) A crime, either oral or written, with intent that it be relied upon by a police officer of
any city or town or by any member of the state police,;
(2) An official formal complaint of misconduct by any law enforcement personnel and/or
law enforcement department/agency; or
(3) An official formal complaint of misconduct by emergency personnel and/or emergency
department/agent; shall be deemed guilty of obstructing an officer a misdemeanor and shall be
imprisoned not exceeding one year and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), and
shall in addition to this imprisonment and/or fine be ordered to make restitution to the person falsely
accused of a crime or misconduct for any damage which the person sustained as a result of the false
complaint.
(b) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Law enforcement” means any permanently employed city or town police officer, state
police officer, public safety officer, sheriff, or capitol police officer.
(2) "Emergency personnel" means emergency services officials, first aid, emergency

medical technicians and personnel, fire safety officials and hospital staff.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002218
========
LC002218 - Page 2 of 3